Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1703
Terms, defined.

As used in the Parking Authority Law, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Authority means a parking authority created pursuant to the Parking Authority Law;

(2) Board means the governing body of such authority, constituted as is provided by section 14-1705;

(3) City means the city of the metropolitan class which requested the Governor to establish a parking authority within the city;

(4) County means the county in Nebraska where the authority is located; and

(5) Facilities means the entire subsurface parking area and all improvements in such parking area or appurtenances used in connection with such parking area, including entrances and exits, and all equipment, machinery, and accessories necessary or convenient for the parking of vehicles.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 3, p. 102;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 287.
July 21, 2022